Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Chapter 7 Relocation Assistance
§ 16-7-121.
Damages in condemnation proceedings.

Nothing in this act shall be construed as creating, in any condemnation proceedings brought under the power of eminent domain, any element of damages not in existence on the date of enactment of this act.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 218, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-749; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 9-745; W.S. 1977, §

9-17-121

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

Section 4, ch. 218, Laws 1973, makes the act effective from and after passage. Approved March 5, 1973.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 16-7-102(a)(x).